Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-127
Simultaneous death; sections, how construed.

Sections 30-121 to 30-128 shall be so construed and interpreted as to effectuate their general purpose to make uniform the law in those states which enact them.

Laws 1947, c. 112, § 7, p. 306.